Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-710
Use of title and abbreviation.

A person licensed as a certified registered nurse anesthetist has the right to use the title certified registered nurse anesthetist and the abbreviation C.R.N.A.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 240.